District of Columbia statutes.
50-1501.03a

Out-Of-State Vehicle Registration Special Fund.

(a)

(1)

There is established as a lapsing fund the Out-Of-State Vehicle Registration Special Fund (“Fund”). The Fund shall be administered by the Office of the Director of the Department of Motor Vehicles.

(2)

All funds collected from the registration of a motor vehicle by a person not domiciled in the District of Columbia in excess of the funds that would have been collected from the registration of an equivalent motor vehicle by a person domiciled in the District of Columbia shall be deposited into the Fund.

(3)

All funds deposited into the Fund but not expended in a fiscal year shall revert to the unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia.

(b)

(1)

The first $25 of each registration fee deposited into the Fund shall be used for programs encouraging residents of the District of Columbia to pursue careers as a driver of a limousine or taxicab, or, if the Chairperson of the District of Columbia Taxicab Commission considers another use to be in the best interests of the proper regulation of the taxicab and limousine industries of the District of Columbia, to such other use.

(2)

Any revenues in excess of those required to be distributed in paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be used by the Department of Motor Vehicles to defray the costs of operating the Fund, including such costs as may arise from determining whether an out-of-state vehicle is permitted to register in the District of Columbia at a higher rate than those charged to an equivalent vehicle owned by a District of Columbia resident; provided, that no revenues in excess of the actual costs of operating the Fund shall be used for this purpose.

(3)

Any revenues in excess of those required to be distributed by paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection shall be used for the operational or capital needs of the District of Columbia Taxicab Commission.

Aug. 17, 1937, 50 Stat. 679, ch. 690, title IV, § 3a
as added Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-130, § 2(c), 55 DCR 1655
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 9011, 61 DCR 9990
This section is referenced in § 50-320 and § 50-1501.03.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-155 substituted “lapsing” for “nonlapsing” in (a)(1); and rewrote (a)(3).
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 2(c) of Non-Resident Taxi Drivers Registration Temporary Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Law 17-29, October 18, 2007, law notification 54 DCR 10699).
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 2(c) of Non-Resident Taxi Drivers Registration Temporary Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Law 17-29, October 18, 2007, law notification 54 DCR 10699).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see §§ 2(c) and 4 of Non-Resident Taxi Drivers Registration Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-58, June 21, 2007, 54 DCR 6599).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see §§ 9011 and 9029 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see §§ 9011 and 9029 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 9011 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).

Nonseverability of D.C. Law 17-130: Section 4 of D.C. Law 17-130 provided: “If any provision of section 2, or its application to any person or circumstance, is held to be unconstitutional, beyond the statutory authority of the Council, or otherwise invalid, then all provisions of this act shall be deemed invalid.”

Section 9029 of D.C. Law 20-155 provided that the amendment by § 9011 of the act shall apply as of September 30, 2014.